local/incubator/apertium-br-fr.br.dix
<?xml version="1.0" encoding="UTF-8"?>
<dictionary>
  <alphabet>AaBbChchC’hc’hDdEeFfGgHhIiJjKkLlMmNnOoPpRrSsTtUuVvWwYyZzùÙêÊñÑâÂîÎôÔûÛüÜ</alphabet>

  <sdefs>
    <sdef n="n"      c="Nom"/>
    <sdef n="np"     c="Nom propre"/>

    <sdef n="mf"     c="Masculin/feminin"/>
    <sdef n="m"      c="Masculin"/>
    <sdef n="f"      c="Feminin"/>
    <sdef n="sg"     c="Singular"/>
    <sdef n="pl"     c="Plural"/>
    <sdef n="sp"     c="Singular/plural"/>

    <sdef n="loc"    c="Location"/>
    <sdef n="ant"    c="Antonym"/>

    <sdef n="pr"     c="Preposition"/>
    <sdef n="cnjcoo" c="Conjonction de coordination"/>

    <sdef n="prn"    c="Pronom"/>
    <sdef n="subj"   c="Subjet"/>
    <sdef n="obj"    c="Objet"/>

    <sdef n="ij"     c="Interjection"/>
    <sdef n="adv"    c="Adverbe"/>

    <sdef n="adj"    c="Adjectif"/>
    <sdef n="sint"   c="Synthetic"/>
    <sdef n="comp"   c="Comparatif"/>
    <sdef n="sup"    c="Superlatif"/>
    <sdef n="excl"   c="Exclamatif"/>

    <sdef n="vblex"  c="Verb"/>

    <sdef n="inf"    c="Infinitif"/>
    <sdef n="pri"    c="Present indicative"/>
    <sdef n="imp"    c="Imperfect"/>
    <sdef n="past"   c="Past definite"/>
    <sdef n="pp"     c="Past participle"/>
    <sdef n="ffi"    c="Future indicative"/>

    <sdef n="p1"     c="1st person"/>
    <sdef n="p2"     c="2nd person"/>
    <sdef n="p3"     c="3rd person"/>

    <sdef n="det"    c="Determiner"/>
    <sdef n="ind"    c="Indefinite"/>
    <sdef n="def"    c="Definite"/>
  </sdefs>

  <pardefs>

    <!-- Initial consonant mutations (Ar c'hemmadurioù) -->
    <pardef n="initial-p">
      <e r="LR">
        <p>
          <l>p</l>
          <r>p</r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e r="LR">
        <p>
          <l>b</l>
          <r>p</r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e r="LR">
        <p>
          <l>f</l>
          <r>p</r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e r="RL">
        <p>
          <l><a/>p</l>
          <r>p</r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>

    <pardef n="initial-t">
      <e r="LR">
        <p>
          <l>t</l>
          <r>t</r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e r="LR">
        <p>
          <l>d</l>
          <r>t</r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e r="LR">
        <p>
          <l>z</l>
          <r>t</r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e r="RL">
        <p>
          <l><a/>t</l>
          <r>t</r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>

    <pardef n="initial-k">
      <e r="LR">
        <p>
          <l>k</l>
          <r>k</r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e r="LR">
        <p>
          <l>g</l>
          <r>k</r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e r="LR">
        <p>
          <l>c'h</l>
          <r>k</r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e r="RL">
        <p>
          <l><a/>k</l>
          <r>k</r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>

    <pardef n="initial-b">
      <e r="LR">
        <p>
          <l>b</l>
          <r>b</r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e r="LR">
        <p>
          <l>v</l>
          <r>b</r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e r="LR">
        <p>
          <l>p</l>
          <r>b</r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e r="RL">
        <p>
          <l><a/>b</l>
          <r>b</r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>

    <pardef n="initial-B">
      <e r="LR">
        <p>
          <l>B</l>
          <r>B</r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e r="LR">
        <p>
          <l>V</l>
          <r>B</r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e r="LR">
        <p>
          <l>P</l>
          <r>B</r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e r="RL">
        <p>
          <l><a/>B</l>
          <r>B</r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>



    <pardef n="initial-d">
      <e r="LR">
        <p>
          <l>d</l>
          <r>d</r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e r="LR">
        <p>
          <l>z</l>
          <r>d</r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e r="LR">
        <p>
          <l>t</l>
          <r>d</r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e r="RL">
        <p>
          <l><a/>d</l>
          <r>d</r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>

    <pardef n="initial-g">
      <e r="LR">
        <p>
          <l>g</l>
          <r>g</r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e r="LR">
        <p>
          <l>c'h</l>
          <r>g</r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e r="LR">
        <p>
          <l>k</l>
          <r>g</r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e r="RL">
        <p>
          <l><a/>g</l>
          <r>g</r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>

    <pardef n="initial-gw">
      <e r="LR">
        <p>
          <l>gw</l>
          <r>gw</r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e r="LR">
        <p>
          <l>w</l>
          <r>gw</r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e r="LR">
        <p>
          <l>kw</l>
          <r>gw</r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e r="RL">
        <p>
          <l><a/>gw</l>
          <r>gw</r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>

    <pardef n="initial-m">
      <e r="LR">
        <p>
          <l>m</l>
          <r>m</r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e r="LR">
        <p>
          <l>v</l>
          <r>m</r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e r="RL">
        <p>
          <l><a/>m</l>
          <r>m</r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>

    <pardef n="initial-M">
      <e r="LR">
        <p>
          <l>M</l>
          <r>M</r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e r="LR">
        <p>
          <l>V</l>
          <r>M</r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e r="RL">
        <p>
          <l><a/>M</l>
          <r>M</r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>


    <pardef n="a__pr">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l/>
          <r><s n="pr"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>

    <pardef n="ac’h__ij">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l/>
          <r><s n="ij"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>


    <pardef n="a/n__det">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>n</l>
          <r>n<s n="det"/><s n="def"/><s n="sp"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e r="LR">
        <p>
          <l>l</l>
          <r>n<s n="det"/><s n="def"/><s n="sp"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e r="LR">
        <p>
          <l>r</l>
          <r>n<s n="det"/><s n="def"/><s n="sp"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>

    <pardef n="u/n__det">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>n</l>
          <r>n<s n="det"/><s n="ind"/><s n="sp"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e r="LR">
        <p>
          <l>l</l>
          <r>n<s n="det"/><s n="ind"/><s n="sp"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e r="LR">
        <p>
          <l>r</l>
          <r>n<s n="det"/><s n="ind"/><s n="sp"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>

    <!-- Pronoms -->

    <pardef n="prsubj__prn">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>me</l>
          <r>prpers<s n="prn"/><s n="subj"/><s n="p1"/><s n="mf"/><s n="sg"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>te</l>
          <r>prpers<s n="prn"/><s n="subj"/><s n="p2"/><s n="mf"/><s n="sg"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>eñ</l>
          <r>prpers<s n="prn"/><s n="subj"/><s n="p3"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>hi</l>
          <r>prpers<s n="prn"/><s n="subj"/><s n="p3"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ni</l>
          <r>prpers<s n="prn"/><s n="subj"/><s n="p1"/><s n="mf"/><s n="pl"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>c’hwi</l>
          <r>prpers<s n="prn"/><s n="subj"/><s n="p2"/><s n="mf"/><s n="pl"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>int</l>
          <r>prpers<s n="prn"/><s n="subj"/><s n="p3"/><s n="mf"/><s n="pl"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>


    <!-- Prépositions -->

    <e lm="ac’h"><i>ac’h</i><par n="ac’h__ij"/></e>
    <e lm="pronoms de subject"><i/><par n="prsubj__prn"/></e>
    <e lm="a"><i>a</i><par n="a__pr"/></e>
    <e lm="kent"><i>kent</i><par n="a__pr"/></e>
    <e lm="an"><i>a</i><par n="a/n__det"/></e>
    <e lm="un"><i>u</i><par n="u/n__det"/></e>
    <e lm="bro"><par n="initial-b"/><i>ro</i><par n="noz__n"/></e>
    <e lm="mouezh"><par n="initial-m"/><i>ouezh</i><par n="noz__n"/></e>
    <e lm="porzh"><par n="initial-p"/><i>orzh</i><par n="ro__n"/></e>
    <e lm="ti"><par n="initial-t"/><i>i</i><par n="ti__n"/></e>
    <e lm="bannhent"><par n="initial-b"/><i>annhent</i><par n="si__n"/></e>
    <e lm="bed"><par n="initial-b"/><i>ed</i><par n="si__n"/></e>
    <e lm="bihanadur"><par n="initial-b"/><i>ihanadur</i><par n="si__n"/></e>
    <e lm="boloñjer"><par n="initial-b"/><i>oloñjer</i><par n="arer__n"/></e>
    <e lm="bourgadenn"><par n="initial-b"/><i>ourgadenn</i><par n="sae__n"/></e>
    <e lm="danevellour"><par n="initial-d"/><i>anevellour</i><par n="arer__n"/></e>
    <e lm="dave"><par n="initial-d"/><i>ave</i><par n="si__n"/></e>
    <e lm="devalenn"><par n="initial-d"/><i>evalenn</i><par n="sae__n"/></e>
    <e lm="died"><par n="initial-d"/><i>ied</i><par n="sae__n"/></e>
    <e lm="distok"><par n="initial-d"/><i>istok</i><par n="si__n"/></e>
    <e lm="dregantad"><par n="initial-d"/><i>regantad</i><par n="si__n"/></e>
    <e lm="galloudegadur"><par n="initial-g"/><i>alloudegadur</i><par n="ro__n"/></e>
    <e lm="garvuhezeg"><par n="initial-g"/><i>arvuhezeg</i><par n="oan__n"/></e>
    <e lm="gloutoni"><par n="initial-g"/><i>loutoni</i><par n="sae__n"/></e>
    <e lm="goudorlec’h"><par n="initial-g"/><i>oudorlec’h</i><par n="ro__n"/></e>
    <e lm="gourfenn"><par n="initial-g"/><i>ourfenn</i><par n="si__n"/></e>
    <e lm="groser"><par n="initial-g"/><i>roser</i><par n="arer__n"/></e>
    <e lm="gwalc’heris"><par n="initial-gw"/><i>alc’heris</i><par n="si__n"/></e>
    <e lm="gward"><par n="initial-gw"/><i>ard</i><par n="si__n"/></e>
    <e lm="gwechenn"><par n="initial-gw"/><i>echenn</i><par n="sae__n"/></e>
    <e lm="gwenc’hoarzh"><par n="initial-gw"/><i>enc’hoarzh</i><par n="si__n"/></e>
    <e lm="gwetur"><par n="initial-gw"/><i>etur</i><par n="noz__n"/></e>
    <e lm="gwiskad"><par n="initial-gw"/><i>iskad</i><par n="si__n"/></e>
    <e lm="kaouded"><par n="initial-k"/><i>aouded</i><par n="sae__n"/></e>
    <e lm="kefridiezh"><par n="initial-k"/><i>efridiezh</i><par n="sae__n"/></e>
    <e lm="kengronnad"><par n="initial-k"/><i>engronnad</i><par n="si__n"/></e>
    <e lm="kilogramm"><par n="initial-k"/><i>ilogramm</i><par n="si__n"/></e>
    <e lm="kontadenn"><par n="initial-k"/><i>ontadenn</i><par n="sae__n"/></e>
    <e lm="krenngernenn"><par n="initial-k"/><i>renngernenn</i><par n="sae__n"/></e>
    <e lm="ma"><par n="initial-m"/><i>a</i><par n="si__n"/></e>
    <e lm="meizad"><par n="initial-m"/><i>eizad</i><par n="si__n"/></e>
    <e lm="merzherinti"><par n="initial-m"/><i>erzherinti</i><par n="sae__n"/></e>
    <e lm="mil"><par n="initial-m"/><i>il</i><par n="oan__n"/></e>
    <e lm="motenn"><par n="initial-m"/><i>otenn</i><par n="sae__n"/></e>
    <e lm="paotrez"><par n="initial-p"/><i>aotrez</i><par n="dam__n"/></e>
    <e lm="pellenn"><par n="initial-p"/><i>ellenn</i><par n="sae__n"/></e>
    <e lm="peuzheñvelder"><par n="initial-p"/><i>euzheñvelder</i><par n="ro__n"/></e>
    <e lm="plakenn"><par n="initial-p"/><i>lakenn</i><par n="sae__n"/></e>
    <e lm="poliser"><par n="initial-p"/><i>oliser</i><par n="arer__n"/></e>
    <e lm="prouad"><par n="initial-p"/><i>rouad</i><par n="si__n"/></e>
    <e lm="tachenn"><par n="initial-t"/><i>achenn</i><par n="sae__n"/></e>
    <e lm="tarner"><par n="initial-t"/><i>arner</i><par n="si__n"/></e>
    <e lm="tiern"><par n="initial-t"/><i>iern</i><par n="oan__n"/></e>
    <e lm="tornaod"><par n="initial-t"/><i>ornaod</i><par n="si__n"/></e>
    <e lm="treizh"><par n="initial-t"/><i>reizh</i><par n="si__n"/></e>
    <e lm="troadenn"><par n="initial-t"/><i>roadenn</i><par n="sae__n"/></e>
    <e lm="Brest"><par n="initial-B"/><i>rest</i><par n="Roazhon__np"/></e>
    <e lm="Mor-Bihan"><par n="initial-M"/><i>or-Bihan</i><par n="Roazhon__np"/></e>
